District of Columbia statutes.
4-217.04

Federal financial participation.

The Mayor shall claim federal financial participation for foster care payments to the fullest extent permissible under the provisions of title IV of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq.).

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1704, 29 DCR 1060
1981 Ed., § 3-217.4.